Idaho, session 2025, S1108.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to Health and Human Services
the following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs
and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026:


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
(1) DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND WELFARE:
I. YOUTH SAFETY & PERMANENCY:
A. YOUTH SAFETY & PERMANENCY:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $14,534,300 $2,389,500 $16,923,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 76,500 20,000 96,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 29,303,900 5,911,900 35,215,800
TOTAL $43,914,700 $8,321,400 $52,236,100
B. FOSTER & ASSISTANCE PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $31,971,700 $31,971,700
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 150,000 150,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 30,704,200 30,704,200
TOTAL $62,825,900 $62,825,900
DIVISIONTOTAL $43,914,700 $8,321,400 $62,825,900 $115,062,000
II. SERVICES FOR THE DEVELOPMENTALLY DISABLED:
A. EXTENDED EMPLOYMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $244,600 $91,600 $3,202,900 $3,539,100
III. EARLY LEARNING & DEVELOPMENT:
A. EARLY LEARNING AND DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $8,455,300 $1,859,200 $2,863,700 $13,178,200


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 131,100 46,300 783,100 960,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 6,393,000 2,020,800 2,885,200 11,299,000
TOTAL $14,979,400 $3,926,300 $6,532,000 $25,437,700
B. IDAHO CHILD CARE PROGRAM:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $24,800 $1,175,000 $1,199,800
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 366,400 $1,604,500 56,557,400 58,528,300
TOTAL $391,200 $1,604,500 $57,732,400 $59,728,100
C. SOUTHWEST IDAHO TREATMENT CENTER:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $5,523,600 $504,900 $81,300 $6,109,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 345,500 137,800 10,600 493,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 6,430,500 1,574,200 139,200 8,143,900
TOTAL $12,299,600 $2,216,900 $231,100 $14,747,600
DIVISIONTOTAL $27,670,200 $7,747,700 $64,495,500 $99,913,400
IV. FAMILY AND COMMUNITY PARTNERSHIPS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $421,700 $41,300 $450,000 $913,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 19,500 50,000 69,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 2,746,400 268,200 2,900,000 5,914,600
TOTAL $3,168,100 $329,000 $3,400,000 $6,897,100


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
V. DIVISION OF WELFARE:
A. SELF-RELIANCE OPERATIONS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $19,582,700 $6,046,700 $25,629,400
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 862,100 3,539,000 4,401,100
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 32,266,800 18,118,600 50,385,400
TOTAL $52,711,600 $27,704,300 $80,415,900
B. BENEFIT PAYMENTS:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $21,154,100 $21,154,100
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 500,000 500,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 32,318,800 32,318,800
TOTAL $53,972,900 $53,972,900
DIVISIONTOTAL $52,711,600 $27,704,300 $53,972,900 $134,388,800
VI. DIVISION OF MEDICAID:
A. MEDICAID ADMINISTRATION AND MEDICAL MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $12,719,300 $12,380,400 $5,779,000 $30,878,700
Medicaid Management Information Systems Dedicated
Fund 82,900 82,900
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 458,000 8,883,800 9,341,800
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 108,400 142,300 250,700


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 18,548,900 33,279,700 19,518,700 71,347,300
TOTAL $31,917,500 $54,686,200 $25,297,700 $111,901,400
B. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $284,003,800 $284,003,800
Hospital Assessment
Fund 43,563,000 43,563,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 1,445,100 1,445,100
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 647,665,200 647,665,200
TOTAL $976,677,100 $976,677,100
C. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $311,577,600 $311,577,600
Hospital Assessment
Fund 4,172,700 4,172,700
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 347,297,000 347,297,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 730,600,500 730,600,500
TOTAL $1,393,647,800 $1,393,647,800
D. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $209,210,400 $209,210,400
Hospital Assessment
Fund 105,089,000 105,089,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 1,023,000 1,023,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 575,619,000 575,619,000
TOTAL $890,941,400 $890,941,400
E. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $88,236,900 $88,236,900
Hospital Assessment
Fund 18,017,200 18,017,200
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 196,248,900 196,248,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 899,933,800 899,933,800
TOTAL $1,202,436,800 $1,202,436,800
DIVISIONTOTAL $31,917,500 $54,686,200 $4,489,000,800 $4,575,604,500
VII. PUBLIC HEALTH SERVICES:
A. PHYSICAL HEALTH SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,172,200 $905,600 $2,623,000 $5,700,800
Idaho Immunization Dedicated Vaccine
Fund 18,970,000 18,970,000
Cancer Control
Fund 76,000 205,000 82,600 363,600
Central Tumor Registry
Fund 360,000 360,000
Rural Nursing Loan Repayment
Fund 250,000 250,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 3,013,800 5,712,700 12,386,200 21,112,700
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 2,406,000 2,100,000 4,506,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 9,870,900 16,886,300 24,299,400 51,056,600
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 0 0 1,000,000 1,000,000
TOTAL $15,132,900 $45,445,600 $42,741,200 $103,319,700
B. EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $75,100 $85,000 $160,100
Emergency Medical Services
Fund 2,178,100 1,400,200 3,578,300
Emergency Medical Services III
Fund $1,700,000 1,700,000
TSE Registry
Fund 128,300 327,000 455,300
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 817,200 551,400 1,368,600
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,036,600 724,300 4,314,200 6,075,100
TOTAL $4,235,300 $3,087,900 $6,014,200 $13,337,400
C. LABORATORY SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,334,500 $723,200 $3,057,700
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 440,600 269,600 710,200
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,341,600 939,300 2,280,900
TOTAL $4,116,700 $1,932,100 $6,048,800
D. HEALTH CARE POLICY INITIATIVES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $110,800 $33,000 $143,700 $287,500


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 81,400 75,000 156,400
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 109,500 33,000 356,300 498,800
TOTAL $301,700 $141,000 $500,000 $942,700
DIVISIONTOTAL $23,786,600 $50,606,600 $49,255,400 $123,648,600
VIII. INDIRECT SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $12,101,300 $8,478,700 $20,580,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 1,591,900 1,502,100 3,094,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 15,921,200 9,378,600 25,299,800
TOTAL $29,614,400 $19,359,400 $48,973,800
IX. LICENSING AND CERTIFICATION:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,171,000 $249,900 $2,420,900
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 1,019,600 12,200 1,031,800
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 4,955,000 637,700 5,592,700
TOTAL $8,145,600 $899,800 $9,045,400
X. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT & PREVENTION:
FROM:
Prevention of Minors' Access to Tobacco
Fund $43,800 $43,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 438,300 438,300
Liquor Control
Fund $650,000 650,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Idaho Millennium Income
Fund 320,000 1,600,000 1,920,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $1,421,900 3,459,200 18,628,400 23,509,500
TOTAL $1,421,900 $4,261,300 $20,878,400 $26,561,600
XI. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
A. CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $5,031,300 $2,745,400 $1,787,800 $9,564,500
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 164,500 164,500
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 3,787,800 1,932,800 1,812,600 7,533,200
TOTAL $8,819,100 $4,678,200 $3,764,900 $17,262,200
B. ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $15,613,900 $4,429,900 $9,243,800 $29,287,600
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 73,000 350,000 423,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 2,761,200 1,142,000 778,700 4,681,900
TOTAL $18,448,100 $5,571,900 $10,372,500 $34,392,500
DIVISIONTOTAL $27,267,200 $10,250,100 $14,137,400 $51,654,700
XII. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. COMMUNITY HOSPITALIZATION:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $4,964,000 $4,964,000


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. STATE HOSPITAL NORTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $10,186,500 $879,000 $45,600 $11,111,100
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 2,253,700 2,253,700
State Hospital North Endowment Income
Fund 644,500 1,181,100 104,400 1,930,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 1,709,300 0 0 1,709,300
TOTAL $14,794,000 $2,060,100 $150,000 $17,004,100
C. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $6,978,900 $225,200 $7,204,100
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 12,977,200 3,299,400 $900 16,277,500
Mental Hospital Endowment Income
Fund 5,406,200 2,208,700 284,700 7,899,600
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 5,583,200 893,100 25,600 6,501,900
TOTAL $30,945,500 $6,626,400 $311,200 $37,883,100
D. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,661,800 $539,500 $8,300 $2,209,600
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 2,867,800 2,867,800
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 2,737,500 0 0 2,737,500
TOTAL $7,267,100 $539,500 $8,300 $7,814,900
DIVISIONTOTAL $53,006,600 $9,226,000 $5,433,500 $67,666,100


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
XIII. INDEPENDENT COUNCILS:
A. DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $206,700 $27,100 $233,800
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 15,000 15,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 490,400 275,900 $31,600 797,900
TOTAL $697,100 $318,000 $31,600 $1,046,700
B. DOMESTIC VIOLENCE COUNCIL:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $248,900 $102,200 $351,100
Domestic Violence Project
Fund 218,000 164,600 $171,800 554,400
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 40,000 40,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 400,100 269,200 12,515,400 13,184,700
TOTAL $867,000 $576,000 $12,687,200 $14,130,200
DIVISIONTOTAL $1,564,100 $894,000 $12,718,800 $15,176,900
DEPARTMENTTOTAL $304,433,100 $194,377,400 $4,779,321,500 $5,278,132,000
(2) STATE INDEPENDENT LIVING COUNCIL:
FROM:
General
Fund $160,500 $122,500 $283,000
State Independent Living Council (Ded)
Fund 319,100 94,400 413,500
TOTAL $479,600 $216,900 $696,500
DIVISIONTOTAL $479,600 $216,900 $696,500


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
GRANDTOTAL $304,912,700 $194,594,300 $4,779,321,500 $5,278,828,500
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs in Health and Human Services listed below
is authorized no more than the following number of full-time equivalent po-
sitions at any point during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026,
unless specifically authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appro-
priations Committee will be notified promptly of any increased positions so
authorized.
Youth Safety and Permanency ..................................460.68
Early Learning and Development ...............................152.83
Southwest Idaho Treatment Center .............................108.00
Extended Employment Services ...................................3.00
Family and Community Partnerships .............................37.00
Division of Welfare ..........................................609.50
Division of Medicaid .........................................302.50
Public Health Services .......................................245.02
Indirect Support Services ....................................244.60
Licensing and Certification ...................................71.90
Substance Abuse and Treatment Prevention .......................12.00
Children's Mental Health ......................................93.67
Adult Mental Health ..........................................184.56
State Hospital North .........................................133.52
State Hospital South .........................................284.41
State Hospital West ...........................................49.25
Developmental Disabilities Council .............................6.00
Domestic Violence Council ......................................6.00
State Independent Living Council ...............................4.00
SECTION 3. GENERAL FUND TRANSFERS. As appropriated, the Office of the
State Controller shall periodically make transfers from the General Fund to
the Cooperative Welfare Fund as requested by the director of the Department
of Health and Welfare and approved by the Board of Examiners.
SECTION 4. TRUSTEE AND BENEFIT PAYMENTS. Notwithstanding the provi-
sions of Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, funds appropriated in the trustee and
benefit payments expense class shall not be transferred to any other expense
classes during fiscal year 2026.
SECTION 5. PROGRAM INTEGRITY. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the Department of Health and Welfare shall be required
to provide those services authorized or mandated by law in each program, only


to the extent of funding and available resources appropriated for each bud-
geted program.
SECTION 6. EDUCATIONAL NEEDS. The Department of Health and Welfare
shall be responsible for the educational needs of school-age children placed
in its custody by the Judicial Branch for either child protective issues or
mental health issues. If the department places a child in a licensed resi-
dential treatment facility that includes a nonpublic accredited school and
it is determined by the department that it is in the best interests of the
child to be educated at the residential treatment facility, then it is the
responsibility of the department to pay for such education per student, per
educational day. Other Idaho state agencies shall not be precluded from
exercising their responsibility to ensure a free and appropriate education
for these students within the requirements of federal disability law. The
fiscal impact of this section is included within existing department base
appropriations.
SECTION 7. CHILD ABUSE PROTECTION TREATMENT ACT FUNDS. Of the amount
appropriated in Section 1 of this act from the Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund, a minimum of $42,000 of federal Child Abuse Protection Treatment Act
(CAPTA) funds appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare shall
be provided to the public health districts each year. Funds for each pub-
lic health district shall be distributed at one-seventh (1/7) of the total
amount, which shall be used for the citizen review panels pursuant to Section
16-1647, Idaho Code.
SECTION 8. TRANSFER OF APPROPRIATIONS. Notwithstanding the provisions
of Section 67-3511(4), Idaho Code, funding provided for the personnel costs
expense class in each division shall not be transferred to any other expense
class within the Department of Health and Welfare during fiscal year 2026.
SECTION 9. MEDICAID TRACKING REPORT. The Department of Health and Wel-
fare's Division of Medicaid and Division of Indirect Support Services shall
deliver a report that compares the Medicaid appropriation, distributed by
month for the year, to the actual expenditures and remaining forecasted ex-
penditures for the year on a monthly basis to the Legislative Services Office
and the Division of Financial Management. The report shall also include a
forecast, updated monthly, of the next fiscal year's anticipated trustee and
benefit expenditures. The format of the report and the information included
therein shall be determined by the Legislative Services Office and the Divi-
sion of Financial Management.
SECTION 10. TRANSFER OF APPROPRIATIONS. Notwithstanding the provi-
sions of Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, funding provided for the trustee and
benefit payments expense class in the Department of Health and Welfare's
Division of Medicaid may be transferred in excess of ten percent (10%) among
the Coordinated Medicaid Plan, Enhanced Medicaid Plan, Basic Medicaid Plan,
Expansion Medicaid Plan, and the Medicaid Administration and Medical Man-
agement Programs, but shall not be transferred to any other budgeted program


or expense class within the Department of Health and Welfare during fiscal
year 2026.
SECTION 11. MEDICAID MANAGED CARE IMPLEMENTATION. The Department of
Health and Welfare's Division of Medicaid shall provide a report to the
Legislative Services Office and the Division of Financial Management on
progress in integrating managed care approaches into the state Medicaid
system. The format of the report and information contained therein shall be
determined by the Legislative Services Office and the Division of Financial
Management. The report shall be submitted no later than December 1, 2025.
SECTION 12. COST-SHARING REQUIREMENT. The Department of Health and
Welfare shall implement cost-sharing in the Division of Medicaid, as re-
quired by Section 56-257, Idaho Code, to the maximum extent that is federally
allowable for the expanded population of children whose families' gross
taxable income exceeds one hundred eighty-five percent (185%) but does not
exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the federal poverty limit (FPL), for
Medicaid-eligible services as identified in House Bill No. 43, as enacted by
the First Regular Session of the Sixty-fourth Idaho Legislature.
SECTION 13. BUDGET INTEGRITY. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, and consistent with its cost containment strategy, the
Department of Health and Welfare's Division of Medicaid shall submit its
budget request in accordance with applicable Idaho law as of the date of
submission. This section does not prohibit the agency from making requests
of the Legislature that would impact any portion of the department's budget.
However, any proposed changes to Idaho Code with an anticipated budgetary
impact shall be identified in narrative form only, without numerical en-
tries. Further, the department shall submit its budget request based on the
forecasted amount for the most recent month available from the report iden-
tified in Section 9 of this act and for the estimated needs of maintaining
operations of the division.
SECTION 14. CASH TRANSFER. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1 of
this act from the Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund, there is hereby appro-
priated and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $640,000 from
the Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund to the Rural Physician Incentive Fund
on July 15, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable, for the Department of
Health and Welfare for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 15. HOME VISITATION PROGRAM. Of the amount appropriated in Sec-
tion 1 of this act, $1,000,000 from the Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund
shall be distributed to the public health districts for the purpose of the
Department of Health and Welfare's Home Visitation Program. These moneys
shall be distributed according to a formula set by the public health district
board of trustees, pursuant to Section 39-411, Idaho Code.
SECTION 16. SMOKING CESSATION. Of the amount appropriated in Section 1
of this act, $2,100,000 from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund shall be dis-
tributed to the public health districts for the purpose of prevention and


cessation programs for tobacco, vape, and other substances as funds allow.
These moneys shall be distributed to each district based on the approved for-
mula of the board of trustees of the Idaho district boards of health as pro-
vided in Section 39-411(6), Idaho Code.
SECTION 17. PROJECT FILTER ALLOWABLE USES. Of the amount appropriated
in Section 1 of this act, $2,406,000 from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund
shall be expended for the purposes of prevention and cessation programs from
tobacco, vape, and other substances as funds allow. No moneys for Project
Filter from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund shall be used for sponsorships
or passive advertising.
SECTION 18. REPORTS ON FACILITY LICENSING AND CERTIFICATIONS. The De-
partment of Health and Welfare's Licensing and Certification Program shall
provide biannual reports to the Legislative Services Office Budget and Pol-
icy Analysis Division and the Division of Financial Management on the sta-
tus of facility licensing and certifications as well as staff workload and
caseload issues. The format of the report and the type of information in-
cluded therein shall be determined by the Legislative Services Office and
the Division of Financial Management. The first report shall be submitted
no later than December 31, 2025, and the second report shall be submitted no
later than June 30, 2026.
SECTION 19. LIMITING TRANSFER OF LEGISLATIVE APPROPRIATIONS. Notwith-
standing the provisions of Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, Cooperative Welfare
(General) Fund moneys appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare's
Divisions of Mental Health Services and Psychiatric Hospitalization may be
transferred between divisions but shall not be transferred to any other di-
vision or program within the Department of Health and Welfare without leg-
islative approval.
SECTION 20. INTERAGENCY PAYMENT FOR A JUVENILE DETENTION CLINICIANS
CONTRACT. No later than July 16, 2025, the Department of Health and Wel-
fare's Children's Mental Health Program shall make an interagency payment
of $327,000 from the Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund to the Department
of Juvenile Corrections to be used for the purchase of contract clinician
services with juvenile detention facilities in Idaho for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 21. BEHAVIORAL HEALTH COMMUNITY CRISIS CENTERS. The seven be-
havioral health community crisis centers shall submit records that indicate
the levels of funding support by fund source. The format of the report and
the information included therein shall be determined by the Legislative Ser-
vices Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division. The contents of these re-
ports shall aid in providing a clearer understanding of the financial sit-
uations of the behavioral health community crisis centers. These reports
shall be submitted by the Department of Health and Welfare to the Legislative
Services Office Budget and Policy Analysis Division no later than December
31, 2025.


SECTION 22. DIRECTING USE OF THE STATE OPIOID RESPONSE GRANT. Funds
available for naloxone shall be available only to first responders for dis-
tribution in the state of Idaho.
SECTION 23. DIRECTING USES OF THE IDAHO MILLENNIUM INCOME FUND. Of the
funds appropriated from the Idaho Millennium Income Fund in Section 1 of this
act, $250,000 shall be used by Idaho Drug Free Youth to support its various
programs, including its annual youth summit, program chapters, and drug free
school coordinators. Idaho Drug Free Youth shall provide to the Department
of Health and Welfare a document that demonstrates operational and fiscal
accountability for the supported programs. Idaho Drug Free Youth shall work
collaboratively with the Department of Health and Welfare and shall sign an
attestation letter or equivalent document that ensures funds will be used in
accordance with this section, with Section 24 of this act, and with any other
applicable rule or law and accounted for using generally accepted accounting
principles.
SECTION 24. IDAHO DRUG FREE YOUTH OVERSIGHT. (1) The Department of
Health and Welfare shall provide oversight for the funds provided in Section
23 of this act for Idaho Drug Free Youth. The Department of Health and Wel-
fare shall:
(a) Provide four distributions of $62,500 for a total distribution of
$250,000. Distributions shall occur no later than July 15, 2025, Octo-
ber 15, 2025, January 15, 2026, and April 15, 2026;
(b) Receive and compile two reports from Idaho Drug Free Youth and
transmit each report to the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office on behalf of the Joint Millennium Fund Com-
mittee by December 30, 2025, and by June 30, 2026, or as soon thereafter
as is practicable. The format of the report and the content therein
shall be determined by the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office;
(c) Withhold or recover distributions pursuant to paragraph (a) of this
subsection if Idaho Drug Free Youth is not operating or has indicated it
intends to no longer operate prior to the close of the fiscal year, if
it does not provide any of the required reports, or otherwise as needed
to address legal or fiscal concerns of funds provided to Idaho Drug Free
Youth; and
(d) Assist Idaho Drug Free Youth, as needed, to ensure services are be-
ing provided as intended by this act and to meet the needs of program
participants.
(2) The Department of Health and Welfare shall not have the authority
to directly manage Idaho Drug Free Youth or direct Idaho Drug Free Youth to
perform functions not required in this section, Section 1, or Section 23 of
this act. The Department of Health and Welfare shall assist Idaho Drug Free
Youth to ensure funds are used in accordance with this act. If the Depart-
ment of Health and Welfare has reason to believe funds are misused in viola-
tion of this section, Section 1, or Section 23 of this act, or any rule or law,
the Department of Health and Welfare may withhold funds until Idaho Drug Free
Youth is in compliance with this act and applicable law. The Department of
Health and Welfare shall immediately notify the Budget and Policy Analysis


Division of the Legislative Services Office on behalf of the Joint Millen-
nium Fund Committee of any misused or perceived misuse of funds. The Depart-
ment of Health and Welfare shall work collaboratively with Idaho Drug Free
Youth to develop an appropriate corrective action plan.
SECTION 25. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The Commu-
nity Hospitalization Program is hereby exempted from the provisions of Sec-
tion 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers into the Commu-
nity Hospitalization Program from other programs within the Department of
Health and Welfare for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 26. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies who are au-
thorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 27. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 28. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.